pt-BR: Tipo de trailer: Engate no pára-choques; Convencional; Anexo; Expansível; Quinta roda; Gooseneck; Trailer com acomodação; Aberto; Eixo único; Eixo duplo; Mini-trailer; Outro
ja: トレーラーの種類: バンパープル; 従来型; エンクローズド; 拡張可能; フィフスホイール; グースネック; 居住空間; オープン; シングルアクスル; タンデムアクスル; ティアドロップ; その他
en: Trailer type: Bumper pull; Conventional; Enclosed; Expandable; Fifth-wheel; Gooseneck; Living quarters; Open; Single axle; Tandem axle; Teardrop; Other
sk-SK: Typ prívesu: Ťahaný príves; Konvenčný; Uzavretý; Rozšíriteľný; Piate koleso; Ťažné zariadenie so zahnutou guľou; Obytné priestory; Otvorený; Jedna náprava; Tandemová náprava; Slza; Iné
bg-BG: Тип ремарке: Теглене за бронята; Конвенционално; Затворено; Разширяемо; Пето колело; Гъша шия; Жилищни помещения; Отворенo; Единична ос; Тандемна ос; Teardrop; Други
zh-CN: 拖车类型: 保险杠拉动; 传统的; 封闭式; 可延伸; 第五轮; 鹅颈管; 工棚区; 开放式; 单轴; 串联轴; 泪滴状; 其他
ro-RO: Tip remorcă: Sistem de tracțiune pentru bara de protecție; Convențională; Închisă; Extensibilă; A cincea roată; Gât de gâscă; Spațiu de locuit; Deschis; O singură punte; Punte în tandem; Lacrimă; Altele
hu: Utánfutó típusa: Lökhárítóhúzó; Klasszikus; Zárt; Bővíthető; Ötödik kerék; Libanyak; Lakóhelyiségek; Nyitott; Egytengelyes; Tandem tengely; Könnycsepp; Egyéb
cs: Typ přívěsu: Tažený od nárazníku; Konvenční; Uzavřený; Rozšiřitelný; Sedlový; Husí krk; Obytný; Otevřený; Jednoduchá náprava; Tandemová náprava; Slza; Jiné
fr: Type de remorque: Traction du pare-chocs; Conventionnelle; Enfermée; Extensible; Sellette; Moniteur en forme de col de cygne; Caravane d’habitation; Ouvert; Essieu simple; Essieu tandem; Mini-caravane; Autre
ru: Тип автоприцепа: Прицеп; Обычный; Закрытый; Расширяемый; Пятиколесный; Гусиная шея; Жилой; Открытый; Одна ось; Две оси; Каплевидный; Другой
nl: Aanhangwagentype: Bumper; Conventioneel; Ingesloten; Uitbreidbaar; Vijfde wiel; Zwanenhals; Woongedeelte; Open; Enkele as; Tandemas; Traan; Andere
vi: Loại toa moóc: Kéo cản; Thông thường; Khép kín; Có thể mở rộng; Năm bánh; Cổ ngỗng; Khoang ở; Mở; Trục đơn; Trục kép; Nhỏ gọn; Khác
pt-PT: Tipo de atrelado: De engate; Convencional; Fechado; Expansível; Com quinta roda; Gooseneck; De alojamento; Aberto; Eixo único; Eixo duplo; Em forma de lágrima; Outro
fi: Perävaunutyyppi: Puskuriveto; Perinteinen; Suljettu; Laajennettavissa; Viides pyörä; Hanhenkaula; Asuintilat; Avoin; Yksi akseli; Tandem-akseli; Kyynel; Muu
nb: Trailertype: Støtfangertrekk; Konvensjonell; Lukket; Utvidbar; Femte hjul; Gooseneck; Boligrom; Åpen; Enkel aksel; Tandemaksel; Teardrop; Annet
sl-SI: Vrsta prikolice: Vlečna z avtomobilsko kljuko; Konvencionalna; Ograjena; Razširljiv; Peto kolo; Gooseneck; Bivalni prostori; Odprt; Enojna os; Tandemska os; Karavan; Drugo
ko: 트레일러 유형: 범퍼 풀; 관습적; 동봉; 확장 가능; 5번째 바퀴; 구즈넥; 거처; 열림; 단일 축; 탠덤 축; 티어드롭; 기타
de: Anhängertyp: Stoßstange; Konventionell; Eingeschlossen; Erweiterbar; Fünftes Rad; Schwanenhals; Wohnquartier; Offen; Einzelner Widerhaken; Tandemachse; Träne; Sonstiges
tr: Römork Tipi: Tampondan çekme; Geleneksel; Kapalı; Genişletilebilir; Beşinci tekerlek; Kaz boynu; Yaşam alanı; Açık; Tek aks; Tandem aks; Gözyaşı; Diğer
da: Trailertype: Bumpertræk; Konventionel; Lukket; Kan udvides; Femte hjul; Svanehals; Opholdsrum; Åben; Enkelt aksel; Tandem aksel; Tåre; Andet
lt-LT: Priekabos tipas: Velkamas; Įprastinis; Uždaras; Išplečiamas; Balninis sukabintuvas; Gooseneck; Gyvenamosios patalpos; Atviras; Viena ašis; Tandeminė ašis; Lašo forma; Kita
zh-TW: 拖車類型: 保險桿拉力; 常規; 封閉式; 可擴展; 第五輪; 鵝頸管; 生活區; 開放式; 單軸; 串聯軸; 淚珠; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta prikolice: Kuka za branik; Konvencionalna; Kompletni; Proširivi; Peti kotač; Gooseneck platforma; Stambene prostorije; Otvoreni; Jednoosovinska; Dvoosovinska; Suza; Ostalo
it: Tipo di rimorchio: Trazione dal paraurti; Convenzionale; Chiuso; Espandibile; Ralla; Collo d’oca; Alloggi; Aperto; Asse singolo; Asse doppio; Goccia; Altro
es: Tipo de remolque: Seguimiento de parachoques; Convencional; Cerrado; Ampliable; Quinta rueda; Cuello de cisne; Vivienda; Abierto; Eje simple; Eje tándem; Lágrima; Otros
pl: Typ naczepy: Przyczepa bumper pull; Konwencjonalny; Załączony; Do rozbudowy; Sprzęg siodłowy; Elastyczna rurka; Pomieszczenia mieszkalne; Otwórz; Pojedyncza oś; Podwójna oś; Łza; Inne
sv: Släptyp: Dragvagn; Konventionell; Stängd; Expanderbar; Femhjulig; Flaktrailer; Trailer för boende; Öppen; Enkel axel; Tandemaxel; Teardrop; Övrigt
th: ประเภทรถพ่วง: แบบดึงกันชน; แบบทั่วไป; แบบปิดครอบ; ขยายได้; ล้อที่ห้า; แบบคอห่าน; ห้องโดยสาร; แบบเปิด; เพลาเดี่ยว; เพลาคู่; หยดน้ำตา; อื่นๆ
el: Τύπος ρυμουλκούμενου οχήματος: Τράβηγμα προφυλακτήρα; Συμβατική; Περίφρακτος; Επεκτάσιμος; Πέμπτος τροχός; λαιμό χήνας; Διαμονή; Ανοιχτή; Μονός άξονας; Διαδοχικός άξονας; Δάκρυ; Άλλο